Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.085

Bars on certain prosecutions.

In a criminal prosecution alleging a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080, the state is barred from joining any offense other than the offenses alleged to be part of the pattern of criminal profiteering activity. When a defendant has been tried criminally for a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080, the state is barred from subsequently charging the defendant with an offense that was alleged to be part of the pattern of criminal profiteering activity for which he or she was tried.

[ 2001 c 222 s 12. Prior: 1985 c 455 s 9.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2001 c 222: See notes following RCW 9A.82.001.